Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1331.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1792, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1792. A. Any person who shall willfully trespass or,
enter, or loiter upon property containing a critical infrastructure
facility without permission by the owner of the property or lawful
occupant thereof shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable by a fine of not less more than One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00), or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term of six
(6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment. If it is
determined the intent of the trespasser is to willfully damage,
destroy, vandalize, deface, tamper with equipment, or impede or
Req. No. 10100 Page 1

inhi bit operations of the facility, the person shall, upon
conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable by a fine of not less
more than Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00), or by imprisonment in
the custody of the Department of Corrections for a term of one (1)
year, or by both such fine and imprisonment. As used in this
subsection, "loiter" means standing or waiting around idly or
without apparent or rational purpose.
B. Any person who shall willfully damage, destroy, vandalize,
deface or tamper with equipment in a critical infrastructure
facility shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony punishable by
a fine of One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), or by
imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for a
term of not more than ten (10) years, or by both such fine and
imprisonment.
C. If an organization is found to be a conspirator with persons
who are found to have committed any of the crimes described in
subsection A or B of this section, the conspiring organization shall
be punished by a fine that is ten times the amount of said fine
authorized by the appropriate provision of this section.
D. As used in this section, "critical infrastructure facility"
means:
1. One of the following, if completely enclosed by a fence or
other physical barrier that is obviously designed to exclude
intruders, or if clearly marked with a sign or signs that are posted
Req. No. 10100 Page 2

on t he property that are reasonably likely to come to the attention
of intruders and indicate that entry is forbidden without site
authorization:
a. a petroleum or alumina refinery,
b. an electrical power generating facility, substation,
switching station, electrical control center or
electric power lines and associated equipment
infrastructure,
c. a chemical, polymer or rubber manufacturing facility,
d. a water intake structure, water treatment facility,
wastewater treatment plant or pump station,
e. a natural gas compressor station,
f. a liquid natural gas terminal or storage facility,
g. a telecommunications central switching office,
h. wireless telecommunications infrastructure, including
cell towers, telephone poles and lines, including
fiber-optic lines,
i. a port, railroad switching yard, railroad tracks,
trucking terminal or other freight transportation
facility,
j. a gas processing plant, including a plant used in the
processing, treatment or fractionation of natural gas
or natural gas liquids,

Req. No. 10100 Page 3

k. a transmission facility used by a federally licensed
radio or television station,
l. a steelmaking facility that uses an electric arc
furnace to make steel,
m. a facility identified and regulated by the United
States Department of Homeland Security Chemical
Facility Anti-Terrorism Standards (CFATS) program,
n. a dam that is regulated by the state or federal
government,
o. a natural gas distribution utility facility including,
but not limited to, pipeline interconnections, a city
gate or town border station, metering station,
aboveground piping, a regulator station and a natural
gas storage facility, or
p. a crude oil or refined products storage and
distribution facility including, but not limited to,
valve sites, pipeline interconnections, pump station,
metering station, below or aboveground pipeline or
piping and truck loading or offloading facility; or
2. Any aboveground portion of an oil, gas, hazardous liquid or
chemical pipeline, tank, railroad facility or other storage facility
that is enclosed by a fence, other physical barrier or is clearly
marked with signs prohibiting trespassing, that are obviously
designed to exclude intruders;
Req. No. 10100 Page 4

3. Any prison facility; or
4. Any county-owned property including, but not limited to,
courthouses and detention centers.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10100 MAH 01/11/25


















Req. No. 10100 Page 5